apertium-moe.moe.twol
Alphabet
 A B Ç D E Ä F G H I J Ž K L M N Ň O Ö P R S Ş T U ᵘ Ü W Y Ý Z
 a b ç d e ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş t u ᵘ ü w y ý z
 %>:0  
 %{ᵘ%}:ᵘ ! %{ᵘ%}:u
 %{t%}:0 ! %{t%}:t
 %{i%}:i ! %{i%}:0
 %{u%}:u ! %{u%}:0
 %{S%}:s ! %{S%}:t
 %{h%}:h ! %{h%}:0
 %{U%}:u ! %{U%}:i
 %{I%}:i ! %{I%}:e
 %{n%}:n ! %{n%}:0
 %{e%}:e ! %{e%}:0
 %{a%}:a ! %{a%}:0
 %{A%}:u ! %{A%}:a
 %{z%}:0

 ;

Sets

Vowel = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y Ý ᵘ
        a e ä i o ö u ü y ý ᵘ ;

Archivowel = %{U%} %{i%} %{u%} %{ᵘ%} %{e%} %{a%} %{I%} %{A%} ;

Group = A E I
	a e i ;

Rules 

"Make ᵘ into u with following suffix"
%{ᵘ%}:u <=>  _ %>: ;

"Add t to prefix before roots beginning with non-u vowel"
%{t%}:t <=> _ %>: [ :Group ] ;
	    _ %>: :u %{z%}: ;

"Remove i from prefix before roots beginning with u"
%{i%}:0 <=> _ %{t%}: %>: :u ;
	    [ :Vowel | Archivowel: ] %>: _ ;
	    [ :Vowel ] %>: _ ;
	    :n %>: _ :n ; ! This needs fixing, since there are cases in which it shouldn't disappear
	    _ %>: %{i%}: ;

"Remove u from prefix before roots beginning with u"
%{u%}:0 <=> _ %{t%}: %>: :u ;
	    _ %>: %{i%}: ;
	    :u %>: _ ;
	    ! :n %>: _ ; ! Idiosyncratically conditioned, according to grammar.  Input VII verb roots accordingly.

"Change sh to t before a suffix: s"
%{S%}:t <=> _ %{h%}: %>: ;
	    except
		_ %{h%}: %>: %{z%}: ; ! Ensure this gets put on the correct forms

"Change sh to t before a suffix: h"
%{h%}:0 <=> %{S%}: _ %>: ;
	    except
		_ :* %{z%}: ;

"Change u to i before some suffixes"
%{U%}:i <=> _ %>: %{i%}: ;

"Remove n from suffix after n-final root"
%{n%}:0 <=> :n %>: _ ;

"Remove e from suffix after vowel-final stem"
%{e%}:0 <=> [ :Vowel | Archivowel: ] %>: _ ;

"Remove a from suffix after vowel-final stem"
%{a%}:0 <=> [ :Vowel | Archivowel: ] %>: _ ;

"Change u to a in inverted-hierarchy VTA verbs"
%{A%}:a <=> _ %>: %{i%}: [ :t | :k ] ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
